Hawaii statutes.
[§659-7] Judgment according to nature of
complaint. In all cases contemplated by sections 659-1 to 659-9, judgment
shall be given according to the nature of the complaint made. [L 1876, c 39,
§42; RL 1925, §2722; RL 1935, §4264; RL 1945, §10285; RL 1955, §236-25; HRS
§659-52; am L 1972, c 90, §3(g); ren HRS §659-7]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next